src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/ca.dic
baj /H
ballar /GH
banyabaix/J
barbull s/J
barcelon /H
basard s/J
bastet /H
bavar s/J
becari/K
begu /H
bellug s/J
benaventur s/J
beneit /H
benjam /H
bergued /H
berrug s/J
bibliotecari/K
bim /H
binari/K
bitumin s/J
bivitel l /H
bla/H
bled /H
bocafluix/J
bocaf /H
bolivi /H
bondad s/J
bonifaci/K
borgi /H
borr s/J
bosc /H
bosquet /H
bot s/J
bov /H
brevilini/L
brill s/J
brit /H
brom s/J
bronz /H
brov s/J
bru/H
burg s/J
butiraci/K
cadarn s/J
cag /H
calamit s/J
calcari/K
cald s/J
calic /H
caliv s/J
calumni s/J
cal /H
cambri /H
camforaci/K
cancer s/J
canton s/J
can /H
capcin s/J
capmoix/J
caputx /H
carabr /H
carcerari/K
carcinomat s/J
cardiaci/K
carl /GH
carmes /H
carpi /H
cartaci/K
cartagin s/J
cartesi /H
casol /H
castel l /H
catarque /H
catarr s/J
caucasi /H
cavil l s/J
cebaci/K
cedr /H
censatari/K
cent /H
cerebel l s/J
ceroferari/K
cerver /H
cesari /H
cespit s/J
cessionari/K
cinc-cent /H
cinquantenari/K
cinquant /H
cinqu /H
cirr s/J
cirurgi /H
cismunt /H
citatori/K
ciutad /H
clement /H
clorit s/J
clovell s/J
coccigi/L
coccini/L
codol s/J
colomb /H
columnari/K
col legatari/K
comanditari/K
comarc /H
comendatari/K
comissari/K
comminatori/K
comodatari/K
compatr /H
compendi s/J
complementari/K
compromissari/K
compr s/J
compulsori/K
concessionari/K
conciutad /H
concl s/J
concrecionari/K
concussionari/K
confidenciari/K
conflent /H
confusionari/K
conf s/J
conidiogen/K
conqu s/J
conservatori/K
consiliari/K
consuetudinari/K
contenci s/J
contest /H
contradictori/K
contrari/K
cont s/J
convocatori/K
copernic /H
copi s/J
coplanari/K
coral l /H
coreligionari/K
corf s/J
corol l /H
coronari/K
corsari/K
cort s/J
cosset /H
crani /H
crapul s/J
cretaci/K
criptocristal l /H
cristal l /H
crom s/J
crustaci/K
cuaf /H
culp s/J
culter /H
curvilini/L
daci/K
dacoroman s/J
daltoni /H
damasqu /H
danubi /H
declamatori/K
declinatori/K
decor s/J
dedicatori/K
deg /H
delegatori/K
delici s/J
demeritori/K
democratacristi /H
dem s/J
denegatori/K
denunciatori/K
deprecatori/K
derisori/K
desair s/J
desat s/J
descomprom s/J
desenari/K
desent s/J
desitj s/J
despossessori/K
destinatari/K
des /H
devoni /H
dextrors/J
diari/K
dicl /H
dignatari/K
dilatori/K
dinerari/K
dinov /H
dipsogen/K
discriminatori/K
disgraci s/J
disset /H
dist s/J
divisori/K
divuit /H
dol /J
domiciliari/K
dominic /H
dori/K
dotz /H
dret /H
fabul s/J
facundi s/J
fadr /H
fagocitari/K
fam s/J
fanfarr /H
farinaci/K
farin s/J
fart /H
fatig s/J
felici /H
fel /H
feni /H
ferroviari/K
ferrugin s/J
fest s/J
fi/GH
fibrinogen/K
fibr s/J
fiduciari/K
filoni /H
fil s/J
fix/J
flexu s/J
fluxionari/K
fog s/J
formulari/K
form s/J
for /H
fotogen/K
fragmentari/K
fragor s/J
franci /H
fredol /H
fredor s/J
fretur s/J
frigi/L
fris /H
fructu s/J
frumentaci/K
frustratori/K
fuligin s/J
fulmini/DL
fumigatori/K
funerari/K
furi s/J
futurari/K
gadit /H
galtapl /H
gal linaci/K
gal lorom /H
gal l s/J
gandes /H
gany /H
garrotx /H
gasc /H
gas s/J
gel s/J
georgi /H
geostacionari/K
german s/J
gibel l /H
ginebr /H
giron /H
glandul s/J
glicogen/K
glob s/J
glumaci/K
gol s/J
gongor /H
grafit s/J
granoller /H
granulomat s/J
gravitatori/K
grecollat /H
greix s/J
gris /H
groenland s/J
guardi /H
guerx s/J
guipusco /H
gustatori/K
hiperf /HVY
hipofisiari/KVY
hispanoameric /HVY
histogen/KVY
hitleri /HVY
humit s/JVY
iacet /H
iberollat /HVY
igualad /HVY
igualitari/KVY
il lusori/KVY
il l s/JVY
immeritori/KVY
immissari/KVY
immunitari/KVY
imperatori/KVY
imperi s/JVY
impiet s/JVY
implacentari/KVY
import /HVY
improperi s/JVY
incendiari/KVY
incestu s/JVY
incomplex/JVY
increpatori/KVY
incur s/JVY
indagatori/KVY
indefens/JVY
indoari/KVY
inextens/JVY
inflamatori/KVY
infrahum /HVY
inf s/JVY
inhospitalari/KVY
injuri s/JVY
inoport /HVY
insatisfactori/KVY
inspiratori/KVY
insuls/JVY
ins /HVY
interdisciplinari/KVY
intermediari/KVY
interurb /HVY
intest /HVY
intimatori/KVY
intracomunitari/KVY
intraven s/JVY
inurb /HVY
invocatori/KVY
iraqui /HVY
irid s/JVY
irrespectu s/JVY
irrisori/KVY
isabel /HVY
israeli /HVY
itinerari/KVY
jacet /H
jactanci s/J
joc s/J
jord /H
jovi /H
judeocatal /H
judiciari/K
judici s/J
juss /H
kanti /H
keny /H
kuwaiti /H
lacet /H
laci/K
laiet /H
lamin s/J
laosi /H
lapidari/K
lap /H
latitudinari/K
lauraci/K
laurini/L
lax/J
legatari/K
legionari/K
lesbi /H
levorotatori/K
liberi /H
libidin s/J
liliaci/K
literari/K
litigi s/J
litu /H
lland s/J
llardiss s/J
llavif s/J
llegany s/J
llegendari/K
lleidat /H
llentill s/J
llep /H
llet s/J
llis/J
llumin s/J
llunyed /H
longilini/L
lusit /H
luxemburgu s/J
mafi s/J
magreb /H
mahomet /H
majoritari/K
malacopterigi/L
malair s/J
malcur s/J
malgust s/J
malmirr s/J
malpl /H
malsony s/J
manacor /H
mandatari/K
mandr s/J
mans/J
many /H
man s/J
mari /H
marmori/K
marsell s/J
mar /H
masturbatori/K
maurit /H
medicament s/J
melindr s/J
membranaci/K
memori s/J
mendeli /H
mercenari/K
merit s/J
mer /H
metropolit /H
micaci/K
migrany s/J
migratori/K
mil lenari/K
mil /H
miracul s/J
mix/J
mixtilini/L
mobiliari/EK
mogreb /H
molest s/J
monitori/K
monocristal l /H
montpeller /H
morb s/J
morfogen/K
morm /H
mosseg s/J
muc s/J
multimilionari/K
mund /H
murmuri s/J
murr /H
musivari/K
narratori/K
necessari/K
necessit s/J
nectari/K
negrell /H
neguit s/J
neogen/K
neperi /H
nervi s/J
nestori /H
nigerocongol s/J
niloticosahari /H
nitr s/J
nonagenari/K
norant /H
notori/K
novaiorqu s/J
nyafeg s/J
padr /H
paleaci/K
paleocristi /H
pall s/J
palmari/K
palmes /H
pamplon s/J
papilionaci/K
papul s/J
parcel lari/K
parlamentari/K
parmes /H
partis /H
past s/J
patibulari/K
paul /H
pecuari/K
pegall s/J
penitenciari/K
peni /H
pensar s/J
perdulari/K
perennifoli/K
peres s/J
permissionari/K
permi /H
perpinyan s/J
perspiratori/K
pesar s/J
petitori/K
piad s/J
pic /GH
piet s/J
pig s/J
piogen/K
pirolign s/J
piscatori/K
placentari/K
planetari/K
planocaducifoli/K
plant s/J
plaquetari/K
ple/H
plenari/K
plorall s/J
plumb s/J
pluridisciplinari/K
poblet /H
pollenc /H
poll s/J
pols s/J
ponent /H
poreg s/J
porraci/K
por s/J
possessori/K
postmeridi /H
precari/K
precipit s/J
premonstrat s/J
preoperatori/K
presbiteri /H
presidiari/K
prestatari/K
presumptu s/J
prioritari/K
prodigi s/J
proditori/K
proletari/K
prolix/J
propiciatori/K
prostibulari/K
protervi s/J
protestatari/K
provinci /H
provisori/K
psicogen/K
pud s/J
purificatori/K
purpur /H
pu  s/J
quarter /GH
quaternari/K
queix s/J
quinquagenari/K
quist s/J
quotidi /H
radi s/J
rancuni s/J
ratx s/J
reaccionari/K
recapt s/J
recordatori/K
rectilini/L
redhibitori/K
referendari/K
reflex/J
reformatori/K
refutatori/K
regat /GH
reguard s/J
reivindicatori/K
rellent s/J
remissori/K
rem s/J
renunciatari/K
repl /H
repropi s/J
reprovatori/K
requisitori/K
rescriptori/K
resolutori/K
restitutori/K
retransm s/J
reverberatori/K
revolucionari/K
re n s/J
ripoll s/J
ripuari/K
roc s/J
rodanx /H
roman s/J
rosaci/K
rossellon s/J
rotatori/K
rubor s/J
rumi s/J
rutinari/K
ru /H
sabor s/J
sacar /H
sacrococcigi/L
sagn s/J
sagunt /H
saltuari/K
salvatg /H
samo /H
sanguinari/K
sanit s/J
saponaci/K
saul s/J
saur /H
sebaci/K
secard /H
secretori/K
secundari/K
sedimentari/K
sediment s/J
selaci/K
selvat /H
senegal s/J
sensori/K
septuagenari/K
ser /H
setmes /H
sexagenari/K
shakespeari /H
siam s/J
silesi /H
sis-cent /H
sobrehum /H
sobrepr s/J
solidari/K
solutri /H
soroll s/J
subalp /H
subcontrari/K
suber s/J
substitutori/K
suec /H
sumatori/K
sumptu s/J
suplementari/K
supramund /H
tailand s/J
tamarit /H
tarragon /H
tavernari/K
teat /H
tel lur s/J
tens/J
teratogen/K
tertuli /H
testaci/K
tibet /H
tiregany s/J
tocatard /H
torn s/J
tosc /H
tradicionari/K
tragit s/J
treball s/J
trempol /H
tretz /H
tributari/K
tripolit /H
tuber s/J
tufaci/K
turqu /H
ubiq itari/KVY
ugand s/JVY
ultradret /HVY
universitari/KVY
untu s/JVY
urali /HVY
uruguai /HVY
usurari/KVY
valenci /H
valu s/J
varsovi /H
vell s/J
venatori/K
veneci /H
vergony s/J
ver s/J
ves /H
vexatori/K
vicissitudinari/K
vigat /H
vilat /H
vilipendi s/J
viper /H
vitul /H
vituperi s/J
voluntari/K
vuitant /H
vultur /H
xafall s/J
xarx /H
xic /H
zel s/J
